Utah statutes.
54-8c-6.   Association for mutual receipt of notification of activities
close to high voltage overhead lines.
(1)  Public utilities may form and operate an association providing for mutual
receipt of notification of activities close to high voltage overhead lines in
a specified area.
(2)  In areas where an association is formed:
(a)  notification to the association is effected as set forth in Section
54-8c-2; and
(b)  public utilities with high voltage overhead lines in the area:
(i)  may become members of the association;
(ii)  may participate in and receive the services furnished by the
association; and
(iii)  shall pay their proportionate share of the cost for the services
furnished.
(3)  The association whose members or participants have high voltage overhead
lines within a county shall file a list containing the name, address, and
telephone number of every member and participating public utility with the
county clerk.
(4)  If notification is made by telephone, an adequate record shall be
maintained by the association to document compliance with the requirements of
this chapter.
